New York, session 2025-2026, S4849.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. 1. The department of transportation shall conduct a traffic 2 and planning study to determine the feasibility of transforming the 3 eastern end of the Harriman campus in connection with the relocation of 4 the Wadsworth Laboratory at Harriman that will allow easier access to 5 the campus from the city of Albany, help better connect and integrate 6 the campus within the city of Albany, and provide reasonable traffic 7 operations allowing for additional acreage for mixed-use development, 8 green space, and multi-modal transportation. For the purposes of this 9 act, the term "Harriman campus" shall mean the W. Averell Harriman state 10 office building campus located in Albany, New York. 11 2. Such study shall examine the challenges, opportunities, cost, and 12 environmental impact of transforming the eastern end of the Harriman 13 campus in connection with the relocation of the Wadsworth Laboratory at 14 Harriman that will allow easier access to the Harriman campus from the 15 city of Albany, help better connect and integrate the Harriman campus 16 within the city of Albany, and provide reasonable traffic operations 17 allowing for additional acreage for mixed-use development, green space, 18 and multi-modal transportation. Further, such study shall take into 19 consideration efforts to harness the full multiplier effect of the 20 public investment, create a diverse capital region research triangle 21 with the State University at Albany, the Albany NanoTech Complex, 22 including the SUNY Polytechnic Institute's College of Nanoscale Science 23 and Engineering, and the SUNY Emerging Technology & Entrepreneurship EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09515-01-5 S. 4849 2 1 Complex (ETEC), examine parts of 27 acres currently targeted for Wads- 2 worth Laboratory to provide space for private sector research & develop- 3 ment spin-off, thereby gaining taxable property, and relocate the 4 University at Albany School of Public Health to the Harriman campus. 5 Such study shall consider the findings of the 2007 Harriman campus link- 6 age study completed by the capital district transportation committee and 7 relevant findings from the Harriman Research and Technology Development 8 Corporation. 9 3. Upon completion of such study, but no later than one year from the 10 effective date of this act, the department of transportation shall issue 11 a report based on the findings of such study to the governor, the tempo- 12 rary president of the senate, and the speaker of the assembly. Such 13 report shall include, but not be limited to: 14 (a) the findings of such study; 15 (b) any short-term and long-term actions that can be implemented by 16 the department of transportation, a plan of action for such implementa- 17 tion, and the estimated cost of such implementation plan; and 18 (c) any recommendations to the governor and legislature. 19 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.